Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1118.01
Expanded function dental hygiene; application for permit; qualifications.

(1) Every applicant for a permit to practice expanded function dental hygiene shall (a) present proof of current, valid licensure under the Dentistry Practice Act as a licensed dental hygienist at the time of application, (b) present proof of at least one thousand five hundred hours of experience as a licensed dental hygienist, (c) present proof of successful completion of courses and examinations in expanded function dental hygiene approved by the board, (d) pass a jurisprudence examination approved by the board that is based on the Nebraska statutes, rules, and regulations governing the practice of expanded function dental hygiene, and (e) complete continuing education as a condition of the permit if required by the board.

(2) Upon completion of these requirements, the department, with the recommendation of the board, shall issue the applicant the applicable permit to practice expanded function dental hygiene.

Laws 2017, LB18, § 10.